Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-234
Acknowledgment; duty of officer.

No acknowledgment of any conveyance shall be taken by any officer, unless the officer taking it shall know or have satisfactory evidence that the person making such acknowledgment is the person described in and who executed such conveyance.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 43, p. 289;

R.S.1913, § 6209;

C.S.1922, § 5608;

C.S.1929, § 76-214;

R.S.1943, § 76-234.